Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3D-102] Definitions. As used in this
article:

"Insurance group" means those insurers
and affiliates included within an insurance holding company system as defined in
article 11.

"Insurer" shall have the same meaning
as set forth in article 1, except that it shall not include:

(1) Agencies, authorities, or instrumentalities of the
United States, its possessions and territories, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico,
the District of Columbia, or a state or political subdivision of a state;

(2) Fraternal benefit societies;

(3) Nonprofit medical and hospital service associations
that are exempt from state and federal income taxes; or

(4) Unauthorized insurers.

"Own risk and solvency assessment" means
a confidential internal assessment, appropriate to the nature, scale, and complexity
of an insurer or insurance group and conducted by that insurer or insurance group,
of the material and relevant risks associated with the insurer or insurance group's
current business plan and the sufficiency of capital resources to support those
risks.

"Own Risk and Solvency Assessment Guidance
Manual" means the Own Risk and Solvency Assessment Guidance Manual
as developed and adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners
and as amended from time to time. A change in the Own Risk and Solvency Assessment
Guidance Manual shall take effect on the January 1 following the calendar year in
which the changes have been adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

"Own risk and solvency assessment summary report"
means a confidential, high-level summary of an insurer or insurance group's own
risk and solvency assessment. [L 2016, c 140, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next